Colorado, session 2026A, HB1017.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-1.3-601, add (1)(h)
as follows:
18-1.3-601. Legislative declaration.
(1) The general assembly finds and declares that:
(h) AN INSURANCE COMPANY, AS PART OF ITS BUSINESS OPERATIONS,
COMPENSATES A DIRECT VICTIM OF A CRIME DUE TO THE CONTRACTUAL
RELATIONSHIP BETWEEN THE INSURANCE COMPANY AND VICTIM WHEREBY
THE VICTIM PAYS THE INSURANCE COMPANY A PREMIUM AND THE
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

INSURANCE COMPANY COMPENSATES THE VICTIM FOR LOSSES SUSTAINED. IN
THESE INSTANCES, CRIMINAL RESTITUTION TO MAKE DIRECT VICTIMS WHOLE
MUST BE PRIORITIZED, WHILE INSURANCE COMPANIES SHOULD RECOVER
THEIR LOSSES THROUGH REMEDIES OTHER THAN CRIMINAL RESTITUTION
ORDERS. HOWEVER, AN INSURANCE COMPANY THAT IS A DIRECT VICTIM OF
A CRIME MUST BE MADE WHOLE THROUGH THE CRIMINAL RESTITUTION
PROCESS, INCLUDING IF THE INSURANCE COMPANY IS A VICTIM OF A SCHEME
TO DEFRAUD THE INSURANCE COMPANY OR WHEN THE INSURANCE
COMPANY'S PROPERTY IS DAMAGED OR STOLEN BY CRIMINAL ACTS.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-1.3-602, amend
(3)(a), (3)(d), (4)(a)(I), (4)(a)(III), and (4)(a)(VI) as follows:
18-1.3-602. Definitions.
As used in this part 6, unless the context otherwise requires:
(3) (a) "Restitution" means any pecuniary loss suffered by a victim
and includes, but is not limited to, all out-of-pocket expenses, interest, loss
of use of money, anticipated future expenses, rewards paid by victims,
money advanced by law enforcement agencies, money advanced by a
governmental agency for a service animal, adjustment expenses, and other
losses or injuries proximately caused by an offender's conduct and that can
be reasonably calculated and recompensed in money. "Restitution" does not
include LOSSES FOR WHICH A VICTIM MAY BE COMPENSATED THROUGH A
PRIVATE INSURANCE POLICY, damages for physical or mental pain and
suffering, loss of consortium, loss of enjoyment of life, loss of future
earnings, or punitive damages.
(d) "Restitution" shall also include ALSO INCLUDES costs incurred by
a governmental agency or A WORKER'S COMPENSATION insurer that provides
medical benefits, health benefits, or nonmedical support services directly
related to a medical or health condition to a victim for losses or injuries
proximately caused by an offender's conduct, including, but not limited to,
costs incurred by medicaid, MEDICARE, and other care programs for indigent
persons.
(4) (a) "Victim" means any person aggrieved by the conduct of an
offender and includes, but is not limited to, the following:
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1017

(I) Any person against whom any felony, misdemeanor, petty
OFFENSE, or traffic misdemeanor offense has been perpetrated or attempted,
INCLUDING AN INSURANCE COMPANY WHEN THE INSURANCE COMPANY IS A
VICTIM OF A SCHEME TO DEFRAUD THE INSURANCE COMPANY OR WHEN THE
INSURANCE COMPANY'S PROPERTY IS DAMAGED OR STOLEN THROUGH A
CRIMINAL ACT;
(III) Any person who has suffered losses because of a contractual
relationship with, including but not limited to, an insurer, or because of
liability under PURSUANT TO section 14-6-110 C.R.S., for a person described
in subparagraph (I) or (II) of this paragraph (a) SUBSECTION (4)(a)(I) OR
(4)(a)(II) OF THIS SECTION;
(VI) Any person who had to expend resources for the purposes
described in paragraphs (b), (c), and (d) of subsection (3) of this section
SUBSECTIONS (3)(b), (3)(c), OR (3)(d) OF THIS SECTION, EXCEPT NOT AN
INSURANCE COMPANY THAT COMPENSATED A VICTIM FOR A LOSS, EXCEPT AS
PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (3)(d) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-1.3-603, amend (8);
and add (12) and (13) as follows:
18-1.3-603. Assessment of restitution - corrective orders.
(8) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this
section, for a non-felony conviction under title 42, C.R.S., The court shall
order restitution concerning only the portion of the victim's pecuniary loss
for which the victim cannot be compensated under a policy of insurance,
self-insurance, an indemnity agreement, or a risk management fund. A
COURT MAY AWARD A VICTIM RESTITUTION FOR A DEDUCTIBLE AMOUNT
UNDER THE VICTIM'S POLICY OF INSURANCE.
(b) The court, in determining the restitution amount, shall consider
whether the defendant or the vehicle driven by the defendant at the time of
the offense was covered by:
(I) A complying policy of insurance or certificate of self-insurance
as required by the laws of this state;
(II) Self-insurance including but not limited to insurance coverage
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1017

pursuant to the provisions of part 15 of article 30 of title 24, C.R.S.; or
(III) Any other insurance or indemnity agreement that would
indemnify the defendant for any damages sustained by the victim.
(c) (I) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (c), a court
may not award restitution to a victim concerning a pecuniary loss for which
the victim has received or is entitled to receive benefits or reimbursement
under a policy of insurance or other indemnity agreement.
(II) (A) A court may award a victim restitution for a deductible
amount under his or her policy of insurance.
(B) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 904, § 28, effective May
21, 2004.)
(d) (I) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 904, § 28, effective May
21, 2004.)
(II) (b) Nothing in this paragraph (d) shall THIS SECTION DOES NOT
prohibit a nonowner driver or passenger in the A vehicle from being
awarded restitution if the NONOWNER driver or passenger was not covered
by his or her THE NONOWNER DRIVER'S OR PASSENGER'S own medical
payments coverage policy.
(e) (I) (c) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, an
insurance company, risk management fund, or public entity shall not be IS
NOT obligated to defend a defendant in a hearing concerning restitution. No
A court shall NOT interpret an indemnity or insurance contract so as to
obligate AS REQUIRING an insurance company, risk management fund, or
public entity to defend a defendant at a restitution hearing absent a specific
agreement.
(II) Notwithstanding any provision of law, indemnity contract, or
insurance contract to the contrary, an insurance company, risk management
fund, or public entity shall not be obligated to pay or otherwise satisfy a
civil judgment entered pursuant to this part 6, or to indemnify a defendant
for an amount awarded in a restitution order.
(f) Nothing in this article shall be construed to limit or abrogate the
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1017

rights and immunities set forth in the "Colorado Governmental Immunity
Act", article 10 of title 24, C.R.S.
(g) (d) The provisions of This subsection (8) shall DOES not preclude
the court, pursuant to article 4.1 of title 24, C.R.S., from ordering restitution
to reimburse an expenditure made by a victim compensation fund.
(12) THIS PART 6 DOES NOT PREVENT AN INSURANCE COMPANY FROM
FILING A CIVIL ACTION OR PURSUING ANY OTHER CIVIL REMEDY AGAINST A
DEFENDANT TO RECOVER LOSSES THE INSURANCE COMPANY SUFFERED.
(13) THIS PART 6 DOES NOT LIMIT OR ABROGATE THE RIGHTS AND
IMMUNITIES SET FORTH IN THE "COLORADO GOVERNMENTAL IMMUNITY
ACT", ARTICLE 10 OF TITLE 24.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1017

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1017